trunk/resultats/myspell/avl.myspell.dic
Absaló/WY
absorbidor-reflectora/VY
abstinga/DZ
accessió/GVY
acinglerada/VY
aclariré/MNZ
acoblava/AZ
acreixés/PZ
acurçament/EVY
acuts/Z
Adern/WY
adinyar/CY
adorm/CUZ
adscrigués/QZ
advendré/TZ
aerocòlia/EVY
afebliré/MNZ
afig/CUZ
aflaquiré/MNZ
agafava/AZ
agalla/EVY
aganada/VY
Agil/WY
Agustí/WY
aiguabatés/PZ
aiguabatuda/VY
ajaiem/RZ
ajeia/OZ
ajeu/CSZ
ajup/CUZ
alabatem/CRZ
Alabern/WY
àlan/EVY
Albagès/WY
Albern/WY
Alborx/WY
Aldrover/WY
alentiré/MNZ
Alfeu/WY
ali/DEVY
allargat/1BVY
al·ludiré/MNZ
Almara/WY
Altabó/WY
Amàlia/WY
amaneixés/PZ
amargotejava/AZ
amebòcit/EVY
amerim/EVY
Amillach/WY
Andriot/WY
anellejat/1VY
anguillana/VY
anhelava/AZ
Anscari/WY
antipirina/EVY
anúria/EVY
Apel·les/WY
apercebés/PZ
apercebré/TZ
apetiré/MNZ
apocopava/AZ
aprehengués/QZ
aprén/CSZ
aprestada/VY
aprofundiré/MNZ
Arbocí/WY
arega/DVY
Arjó/WY
arquèspora/EVY
arrebós/Z
arremetem/CRZ
arremetia/OZ
arrup/CUZ
Artemi/WY
ascensor/EVY
assaltant/CEVY
asserviré/MNZ
asseuré/TZ
assortiré/MNZ
atenyés/PZ
atorrollava/AZ
atragués/QZ
aturafletxes/VY
Auger/WY
augític/FVY
autoabastiré/MNZ
autodissoldré/TZ
autotraduiré/MNZ
barbull/CEU
bat/CES
begués/Q
bestraiem/R
bestreia/O
boriré/MN
botés/P
brum/CEU
brunz/CU
bull/CEU
caldré/T
canusiré/MN
captengués/Q
cern/CS
cernés/P
circuiré/MN
circumscrivim/R
clogués/Q
cloïa/O
coldré/T
combatés/P
comparegués/Q
compareix/CS
compareixem/R
complaïa/O
complanyés/P
compondré/T
comprengués/Q
concebés/P
condol/CES
condolem/R
condorm/CU
coneixia/O
confegiré/MN
confongués/Q
consent/CU
constrenyeré/T
construiré/MN
consum/CEU
contorcés/P
convenç/CS
convencem/CR
convencés/P
convengués/Q
conviuré/T
convivia/O
creixés/P
creu/CES
cruix/CIU
cus/CU
debatem/CR
debatré/T
decebés/P
decebia/O
decresqués/Q
deglutiré/MN
deprèn/CS
derruiré/MN
desapareixem/R
desapareixeré/T
desaprenia/O
desavengués/Q
desconeix/CS
desconeixeré/T
descreiem/R
descrivia/O
desemmelangiré/MN
desendolciré/MN
desentengués/Q
desenterboliré/MN
desinhibiré/MN
desment/CU
desmereixés/P
desplauré/T
despon/CS
desprenem/R
destorcia/O
desuniré/MN
detengués/Q
deuré/T
dirigiré/MN
dissol/CS
distenem/R
distorcia/O
ebúrnia/EVY
ecogràfic/FVY
Efrén/WY
eixobren/CZ
elidiré/MNZ
emancipadora/VY
embastonat/1VY
embogiré/MNZ
emetés/PZ
emetré/TZ
emmarava/AZ
emmodorriré/MNZ
empanada/EVY
empobriré/MNZ
emprèn/CSZ
emprengués/QZ
emprovat/1VY
encalliré/MNZ
encàustica/VY
encenem/RZ
encloïa/OZ
encolliré/MNZ
encorrereu/Z
endrecer/FVY
enfadeiré/MNZ
enfillat/BVY
enfujo/Z
engallardiré/MNZ
engormandiré/MNZ
engul/CUZ
ennobliré/MNZ
enramat/1VY
enrevoltat/1VY
enronquiré/MNZ
enroscava/AZ
entossudiré/MNZ
entremetré/TZ
entreobrien/Z
entretancar/CY
envalentiré/MNZ
enverinosava/AZ
eó/GVY
equival/CSZ
equivalgués/QZ
Ermità/WY
esbadinat/1VY
esbatem/CRZ
esbatés/PZ
esblanquiré/MNZ
escandalitzada/VY
escarcanyava/AZ
escatiré/MNZ
escenògraf/FVY
escometia/OZ
escometré/TZ
escruix/CUZ
escup/CUZ
esdevinguéreu/Z
esgaldinyat/1VY
esgroguissada/VY
espaordiré/MNZ
Espinac/WY
espirejada/VY
espitxat/1VY
esplaiava/AZ
essés/PZ
estén/CSZ
estereoestructura/EVY
estiregassat/1VY
Estivill/WY
estorcem/CRZ
estordiré/MNZ
estrafeia/Z
estrenyeré/TZ
estrenyia/OZ
etrusca/VY
excomunicable/EVY
eximiré/MNZ
exterminadora/VY
Exupèria/WY
fengués/Q
feny/CS
fenyés/P
fideïcometem/CR
flectiré/MN
fondré/T
fonia/O
frig/CU
gemiré/MN
gruny/CEU
haguera/Z
helodermàtid/EVY
homòfob/FVY
hortellà/HVY
Hortensi/WY
incondicionat/BVY
incorreguessin/Z
influiré/MNZ
ingerit/23VY
inscriu/CSZ
interrompem/CRZ
interrompés/PZ
intervendré/TZ
intervindré/Z
íntim/FVY
introvertiré/MNZ
ireixia/OZ
jagués/Q
llig/CU
malprèn/CS
malprendré/T
malvenem/R
malvivia/O
manumetés/P
marfondiré/MN
marfongués/Q
ment/CEU
menyscreuré/T
mereix/CS
molem/CR
movia/O
Obon/WY
obsediré/MNZ
obtendré/TZ
obvengués/QZ
obvinc/Z
odorosa/VY
òfset/EVY
ol/CSZ
ometés/PZ
Orellana/WY
orsa/DEVY
perbull/CU
percebem/CR
perdia/O
perfondré/T
permetés/P
persuadiré/MN
perviu/CS
plangués/Q
planyem/CR
plouré/T
plovia/O
preconcebés/P
preexistiré/MN
pressent/CU
pretén/CS
prevalem/R
prometia/O
promogués/Q
puny/CEU
rauré/T
reabsol/CS
readmetem/CR
readmetés/P
readmetia/O
readquiriré/MN
recaigués/Q
recenyiré/MN
recoem/R
recompon/CS
recomponia/O
recreixés/P
recull/CEU
refondré/T
refongués/Q
refregiré/MN
reintroduiré/MN
remou/CS
removem/R
removia/O
resseguiré/MN
ressent/CU
restituiré/MN
retongués/Q
retonia/O
retorç/CS
retorcem/CR
retorcés/P
retrovendré/T
retruny/CEU
revenç/CS
revivia/O
revolem/CR
romangués/Q
sent/CU
sobat/CS
sobatés/P
sobreentenem/R
sobreentenia/O
sobreprotegiré/MN
sobreseuré/T
sobreteixiré/MN
sobrevalgués/Q
sostragués/Q
subjau/CS
supondré/T
suponem/R
suponia/O
surt/CEU
temés/P
tix/CU
tolgués/Q
trairé/MN
transmetés/P
Udalric/WY
ullprèn/CSZ
ultralleuger/FVY
uniformava/AZ
valdré/T
vencem/CR
vencia/O
vengués/Q
